Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 17. Organization and Administration of Departments.

Sec. 44.17.005.
Offices and departments.

There are in the state government the following principal offices and departments:

Office of the Governor

Department of Administration

Department of Law

Department of Revenue

Department of Education and Early Development

Department of Health and Social Services

Department of Labor and Workforce Development

Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development

Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs

Department of Natural Resources

Department of Fish and Game

Department of Public Safety

Department of Transportation and Public Facilities

Department of Environmental Conservation

Department of Corrections.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 200 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 207 SLA 1975; am § 94 ch 218 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 39, §§ 7, 13 (1977); am E.O. No. 55, § 37 (1984); am E.O. No. 58, § 19 (1984); am § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.15.010. Renumbered in 1980. Paragraphs (13)-(15) were formerly (15), (16), and (18), respectively; renumbered in 2004 to reflect the earlier repeals of former paragraphs (13), (14), and (17).

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in paragraph (5), “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in paragraph (7), and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in paragraph (8) in accordance with §§ 88-90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.17.010.
Delegation of functions.

The principal executive officer of each state department may assign the functions vested in the department to subordinate officers and employees.

History.

(§ 3 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For introductory and notification provisions, see 11 AAC 95, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 44.17.020.
Divisions.

The principal executive officer of each department may, with the approval of the governor, establish divisions or other administrative or organization units within the department in the interests of economy and efficiency and in accord with sound administrative principles and practices.

History.

(§ 3 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.17.030.
Regulations.

The principal executive officer of each department may adopt regulations, consistent with law or regulations established by the governor, for

the administration of the department;

the conduct of employees;

the distribution and performance of business; and

the custody, use, and preservation of the records, documents, and property pertaining to department business.

History.

(§ 3 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For intergovernmental relations, see 2 AAC 12, art. 14.

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

For unincorporated community capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 155.

For tender, acceptance, and conveyance of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 1.

For official recognition of village entities under
AS

44.33.755(b)

, see 3 AAC 190, art. 2.

For ascertaining the views of village residents where no organized village, see 3 AAC 190, art. 3.

For management of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 4.

For disposal by state of municipal trust land, see 3 AAC 190, art. 5.

For disposition of land and funds upon incorporation of a municipality in a native village, see 3 AAC 190, art. 6.

For policy on nondiscriminatory treatment, see 6 AAC 65, art. 1.

For complaint procedure, see 6 AAC 65, art. 2.

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

For fire service operations, see 13 AAC 52.

For emergency guards, see 13 AAC 62.

For appearance, see 13 AAC 65.

For state ferries (Alaska marine highway), see 17 AAC 70, art. 1.

Sec. 44.17.040.
Department staffs.

The principal executive officer of each department may establish necessary subordinate positions, make appointments to these positions, and remove persons appointed within the limitations of appropriations and subject to state personnel laws.
Each person appointed to a subordinate position established by the principal executive officer is under the supervision, direction, and control of the officer.

History.

(§ 5 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.17.050.
Continuation of functions.

Each department exercising the functions, powers, and duties of a former department or agency is, for the purpose of succession to all rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the former department or agency, considered a continuation of the former department or agency.
If a former agency is referred to by law, contract, or document, the reference is considered to apply to the department now exercising the functions of the former agency.

History.

(§ 21 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.17.060.
Unassigned functions.

Administrative functions established by law that are not assigned by law to any department shall be assigned by the governor to that department which, in accordance with the organization of state government, can most appropriately and effectively perform the activity.

History.

(§ 29 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For policy on nondiscriminatory treatment, see 6 AAC 65, art. 1.

For complaint procedure, see 6 AAC 65, art. 2.

Sec. 44.17.070.
Reorganization by department heads.

Subject to state personnel laws and the approval of the commissioner of administration, the principal executive officer of each department may, in the interest of improved management, abolish unnecessary offices and positions, transfer officers and employees between positions, and change the duties, titles, and compensation of existing offices and positions.

History.

(§ 23 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.17.080.
Appearance before the legislature.

The principal executive officer of each department and each employee of a department of the state government may not appear before the legislature to present requests or information pertaining to appropriations or revenue bills unless called upon to do so by the legislature or by a committee of the legislature.

History.

(§ 10-1-6 ACLA 1949)